District of Columbia statutes.
25-805

Nuisance.

(a)

Any building, ground, or premises where an alcoholic beverage is manufactured, sold, kept for sale, or permitted to be consumed in violation of this title shall be a nuisance.

(b)

An action to enjoin any nuisance defined in subsection (a) of this section may be brought in the name of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel in the Civil Branch of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia against any person conducting or maintaining such nuisance or knowingly permitting such nuisance to be conducted or maintained.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, ch. 4, § 41
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 104, ch. 159, § 404(j)
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-805.
1973 Ed., § 25-139.